Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. State Board of Education and Early Development and Department of Education and Early Development.

Sec. 44.27.010.
Board and commissioner of education.

There is at the head of the Department of Education and Early Development a Board of Education and Early Development.
The commissioner of education and early development is the principal executive officer of the department.

History.

(§ 11 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 12 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” and “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2000, “Board of Education and Early Development” was substituted for “Board of Education” in accordance with sec. 104, ch. 21, SLA 2000.

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 9, 17, 18

67B Am. Jur. 2d, Schools, §§ 66-95

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories and Dependencies, § 64.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, §§ 3 to 175.

Sec. 44.27.020.
Duties of department.

The Department of Education and Early Development shall

administer the state’s program of education at the elementary, secondary, and adult levels, including, but not limited to, programs of vocational education and training, library services, and correspondence courses, but not including degree programs of postsecondary education;

administer the historical library; and

plan, finance, and operate related school and educational activities and facilities;

[Repealed, E.O. No. 108, § 88 (2003).]

History.

(§ 11 ch 64 SLA 1959; am § 77 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 1979; am E.O. No. 62, § 3 (1986); am § 53 ch 58 SLA 1999; am E.O. No. 108, § 88 (2003))

Administrative Code. —

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.